New Jersey, session 222, A4338.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  In any proceeding involving the court determining the need for guardianship services for an individual pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2005, c.304 (C.3B:12-24.1) and N.J.S.3B:12-25, the court shall consider, but is not limited to, the following factors: (1)   the health, safety, and the well-being of the individual; (2)   the ability of the potential guardian to care for the individual; (3)   any pre-established relationship between the potential guardian and the individual; (4)   any affidavits or certifications provided by physicians evidencing the individuals incapacity as defined pursuant to N.J.S.3B:1-2; (5)   any report provided to the court by a court-appointed counsel for the alleged incapacitated individual in an incapacity hearing; and (6)   any issue relevant to the care of the alleged incapacitated individual or the management of the individuals estate. b.    After consideration of the factors set forth in subsection a. of this section, any determination that an individual is in need of guardianship services pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2005, c.304 (C.3B:12-24.1) and N.J.S.3B:12-25 shall be based on clear and convincing evidence. c.     The court shall specifically place on the record the factors and evidence which justify the appointment of a guardian for an individual. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.